Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.210

New or additional bond.

Any person interested may at any time by verified petition to the court, or otherwise, complain of the sufficiency of any bond or sureties thereon, and the court may upon such petition, or upon its own motion, and with or without hearing upon the matter, require the personal representative to give a new, or additional bond, or bonds, and in all such matters the court may act in its discretion and make such orders and citations as to it may seem right and proper in the premises.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.210. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 70; RRS s 1440; prior: 1891 p 383 s 13 1/2; Code 1881 s 1404; 1877 p 212 s 4; 1863 p 221 s 131; 1860 p 183 s 98.]